Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1441XD (4) 91 as/js S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 692A.102, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (05) Grooming in violation of section 3 709.8A. 4